public_html/app/tools/spellchecker/dictionaries/vec.dic
adintar/A
alear/A
inamorar/A
arbitrar/A
dexarmiđar/A
ativar/A
aver/A
xbadajar/A
bakar/A
balkar/A
strabalŧar/A
xbandonar/A
dexbaraŧar/A
inbaronar/A
debàter/A
inbautar/A
baxotar/A
begar/A
bestemar/A
bexoñar/A
bibiar/A
bindolar/A
biskar/A
blokar/A
reboɉir/A
dexbolar/A
bonaŧar/A
xborir/A
exborsar/A
inbotiliar/A
brakiđar/A
bragolar/A
brandir/A
brevetar/A
brivar/A
inbroɉar/A
inbroxar/A
brustolar/A
xbufar/A
inbutirar/A
camar/A
scarir/A
cèñer/A
aparcéñer/A
skoncetar/A
descodar/A
cucar/A
indafarar/A
dentar/A
deskalsar/A
dexnodar/A
predíxer/A
dolorar/A
domenar/A
adorar/A
xdotoređar/A
durar/A
đavajar/A
đontar/A
đugolar/A
elèđer/A
inerbar/A
ineskar/A
exentar/A
likuefar/A
fadegar/A
falkar/A
fanfuñar/A
infarinar/A
faxanar/A
falsifegar/A
senplifegar/A
defénder/A
konferir/A
fermentar/A
infiar/A
desfiapir/A
desfidar/A
filar/A
afinar/A
fiorar/A
infiscar/A
reflèter/A
fofar/A
refolar/A
forar/A
reformar/A
refornir/A
infradelar/A
frantumar/A
infraskonar/A
sfraŧelar/A
sfregolar/A
fritegar/A
frontar/A
infugar/A
profumar/A
funŧionar/A
fuxilar/A
galantejar/A
xgalonar/A
xganbetar/A
ingarbir/A
xgardufar/A
xgarxar/A
xgaxolar/A
gloriar/A
ingonbrar/A
xgorbiar/A
retrogradir/A
xgranar/A
xgranelar/A
dexgrasar/A
dexgravar/A
ingrejar/A
xgretolir/A
ingriñolir/A
grixolir/A
ingrosar/A
guantar/A
malgualivar/A
gucar/A
gustar/A
proibir/A
industriar/A
ingorgar/A
inpresionar/A
insir/A
intivar/A
ipotiđar/A
exíɉer/A
xɉaŧar/A
dexɉemar/A
inɉòter/A
ɉutar/A
deskaenar/A
kaiđar/A
kalibrar/A
kalkolar/A
deskalŧar/A
inkamixar/A
kaneđar/A
inkankarar/A
kanpar/A
deskantonar/A
inkaparar/A
rekapitolar/A
karakolar/A
kareŧar/A
deskarnaŧar/A
inkartar/A
inkartoŧar/A
rekaskar/A
katarar/A
deskatramar/A
deskaŧar/A
rekavar/A
deskavedar/A
kietar/A
skòder/A
arkòjer/A
inkokonar/A
kolgar/A
skolpar/A
komenŧiar/A
inkónber/A
konfutar/A
koniugar/A
rekonóser/A
kontenplar/A
konŧar/A
konxeturar/A
kórer/A
skoraɉir/A
akòrđer/A
inkornar/A
skorporar/A
kostumar/A
deskoŧar/A
kòxer/A
skrepolar/A
skrikar/A
skrokolar/A
krostinar/A
kruŧiar/A
kuaɉar/A
kuentar/A
kufar/A
skukar/A
kunar/A
prokurar/A
akuxar/A
lagremar/A
lanpar/A
delapidar/A
tralasar/A
xlavar/A
ledrar/A
legrar/A
lestir/A
lexenar/A
skuilibrar/A
xlikiñar/A
liñar/A
logorar/A
loxar/A
relúxer/A
xmakar/A
demandar/A
manxar/A
mariđar/A
inmascar/A
xmatiđar/A
mediar/A
xmalmenar/A
dexmerdar/A
ométer/A
xmilŧir/A
inmixerir/A
mòlđer/A
tramontar/A
morbinar/A
xmorŧar/A
mudar/A
inmurar/A
muxegar/A
navegar/A
nevegar/A
noleđar/A
nuvolir/A
odiar/A
oɉar/A
olsar/A
dexonorar/A
oriđonar/A
ostregar/A
inpadronir/A
despalar/A
spalpuñar/A
spanpalar/A
reparar/A
partir/A
repasar/A
pastroŧar/A
paŧientar/A
spekular/A
inpeliŧar/A
spénđer/A
despeñar/A
inperlar/A
inpetir/A
petufiar/A
repiantar/A
inpiegar/A
piñatar/A
piriar/A
piŧar/A
poer/A
spolveriđar/A
propóner/A
spontar/A
ponxetar/A
pòrxer/A
inpotegar/A
intraprénder/A
raprexentar/A
prosimar/A
puñalar/A
spuŧolir/A
rakordar/A
arankar/A
raskiar/A
dexredar/A
reñar/A
riduŧar/A
derivar/A
surogar/A
ronkir/A
rotamar/A
rugolar/A
insabiar/A
insakolar/A
salmistrar/A
sanɉotar/A
desavir/A
scolar/A
sekuestrar/A
seguestrar/A
seleđar/A
akonsentir/A
desepelir/A
disestar/A
sibilar/A
sindakar/A
skainar/A
skarabocar/A
iskaturir/A
skiŧetar/A
skrimiatolar/A
skuriar/A
soleɉar/A
sonar/A
sorseɉar/A
sparlacar/A
sperar/A
spicar/A
respirar/A
insporkar/A
restar/A
stankeɉar/A
istekar/A
restimar/A
istivalar/A
strakolar/A
konstrénđer/A
strukar/A
stukar/A
subiar/A
sumariar/A
sutilir/A
destaɉar/A
tamixar/A
destaponar/A
tartaɉar/A
tavelar/A
esténder/A
intenperar/A
intenutar/A
sosteñir/A
apartéñer/A
soterar/A
kontestar/A
retirar/A
stokiđar/A
sintoniđar/A
torkolar/A
stòrđer/A
protràer/A
tramacar/A
destrasinar/A
tràxer/A
treŧar/A
intristar/A
retrovar/A
turbinar/A
ŧavarɉar/A
ŧentraliđar/A
inŧernir/A
ŧigar/A
reŧiñar/A
deŧolar/A
ultimar/A
maluxar/A
validar/A
vantaxar/A
invecar/A
sorvejar/A
vendegar/A
deveñir/A
avèñer/A
verdeđar/A
xvernar/A
pervèrter/A
investigar/A
xvimenar/A
viŧar/A
vodar/A
malvoler/A
xvoltolar/A
xafar/A
xbaratar/A
inxeloxir/A
xgurar/A
xmerejar/A
sprexudegar/A
